Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.005

Intent.

It is the intent of this chapter to promote open competition and transparency for all contracts for goods and services entered into by state agencies, unless specifically exempted under this chapter. It is further the intent of this chapter to centralize within one agency the authority and responsibility for the development and oversight of policies related to state procurement and contracting. To ensure the highest ethical standards, proper accounting for contract expenditures, and for ease of public review, it is further the intent to centralize the location of information about state procurements and contracts. It is also the intent of the legislature to provide state agency contract data to the public in a searchable manner.

In addition, the legislature intends that the state develop procurement policies, procedures, and materials that encourage and facilitate state agency purchase of goods and services from Washington small businesses.

[ 2012 c 224 s 1.]